Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 10 Operators’ and Chauffeurs’ Licenses

31-10-1.
License required to drive.

No person, except those expressly exempted in this chapter, shall drive any motor vehicle upon a highway in this state unless that person has a valid license as an operator or chauffeur under the provisions of this chapter. No person shall receive an operator’s license unless and until he or she surrenders to the division of motor vehicles all valid operators’ licenses in his or her possession issued to that person by any other jurisdiction. All surrendered licenses shall be returned by the division of motor vehicles to the issuer together with the information that the licensee is now licensed in this state. No person shall be permitted to have more than one valid operator’s license at any time. Any resident as defined under §

31-1-18

shall be required to obtain a Rhode Island operator’s or chauffeur’s license within thirty (30) days of establishing residency.

No person shall drive a motor vehicle as a chauffeur unless he or she holds a valid chauffeur’s license. No person shall receive a chauffeur’s license unless and until he or she surrenders to the division of motor vehicles any operator’s license issued to him or her, or an affidavit that he or she does not possess an operator’s license.

Any person holding a valid chauffeur’s license under this chapter need not procure an operator’s license.

Any person licensed as an operator or chauffeur under this chapter may exercise the privilege granted by that license upon all streets and highways in this state, and shall not be required to obtain any other license to exercise that privilege by any county, municipal, or local board, or by any body having authority to adopt local police regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 26, § 1.

31-10-2.
Persons exempt from licensing requirements.

The following persons are exempt from the licensing requirements of this chapter:

Any employee of the United States government while operating a motor vehicle owned by or leased to the United States government and being operated on official business;

A nonresident who is at least sixteen (16) years of age and who has in his or her immediate possession a valid operator’s license issued to him or her in his or her home state or country may operate a motor vehicle in this state only as an operator;

A nonresident who is at least eighteen (18) years of age and who has in his or her immediate possession a valid chauffeur’s license issued to him or her in his or her home state or country may operate a motor vehicle in this state either as an operator or chauffeur. Subject to the age limits applicable to chauffeurs in this state, that license shall be accepted as a chauffeur class I license. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a nonresident must submit an application for a chauffeur class I license which must be approved before a nonresident may be employed as a chauffeur in this state;

Any nonresident who is at least eighteen (18) years of age, whose home state or country does not require the licensing of operators, may operate a motor vehicle as an operator only, for a period of not more than ninety (90) days in any calendar year, if the motor vehicle so operated is duly registered in the home state or country of that nonresident;

Any operator of any traction engine, road roller, farm tractor, crane, power shovel, well-borer, and any other road and building construction machinery and equipment, other than a truck used for the transportation of materials.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 2; P.L. 1954, ch. 3323, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 273, § 1.

31-10-3.
Persons ineligible for licenses.

The division of motor vehicles shall not issue any license under this chapter:

To any person, as an operator, who is under the age of sixteen (16) years;

To any person, as a chauffeur, who is under the age of eighteen (18) years;

To any person, as an operator or chauffeur, whose license has been suspended, during that suspension, nor to any person whose license has been revoked, except as provided in §

31-11-10

;

To any person, as an operator or chauffeur, who is a habitual drunkard or habitual user of drugs to such an extent that he or she is incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle;

To any person, as an operator or chauffeur, who is required by this chapter to take an examination unless that person shall have successfully passed that examination;

To any person who is required under the laws of this state to deposit proof of financial responsibility and who has not deposited that proof;

To any person when the administrator of the division of motor vehicles has good cause based on clear and convincing evidence to believe that that person does not meet a standard of physical or mental fitness for motor vehicle licensure established pursuant to §

31-10-44(b)

and that the person’s physical or mental condition prevents him or her from being able to operate a motor vehicle with safety upon the highway;

To any person when the administrator of the division of motor vehicles has good cause to believe that the operation of a motor vehicle on the highways by that person would pose an imminent safety risk to the general public as determined by objectively ascertainable standards;

To any person who is subject to an order issued pursuant to §

14-1-67

.

The division of motor vehicles shall notify in writing any person whose application for a license has been denied pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. The notice shall contain the factual and legal basis for the denial, the procedure for requesting a hearing, and the rights afforded the individual pursuant to the provisions of §

31-11-7(d)

— (f). When physical or mental fitness is the basis for the denial, the notice shall reference the specific functional standard promulgated pursuant to §

31-10-44(b)

, which was relied upon by the division of motor vehicles. Upon his or her request the division of motor vehicles shall afford the license applicant an opportunity for a hearing as early as practical and no later than twenty (20) days after receipt of the request.

The hearing procedures afforded the applicant shall conform to the provisions of §

31-11-7(d)

— (f).

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 3; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-3

; P.L. 1959 (s.s.), ch. 190, § 2; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 196, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 89, § 1.

31-10-4.
Classification of chauffeurs — Examination of applicants.

The division of motor vehicles upon issuing a chauffeur’s license shall indicate on it the class of license so issued and shall appropriately examine each applicant according to the class of license applied for and may impose any rules and regulations for the exercise of that license as it may deem necessary for the safety and welfare of the traveling public.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-4

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-10-5.
Special restrictions for drivers for compensation.

No person who is under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall drive any school bus transporting school children or any motor vehicle when in use for the transportation of persons or property for compensation nor in either event until he or she has been licensed as a chauffeur for either purpose and the license so indicates. Colleges and universities shall be exempt from the requirement for a public plate for vehicles used to shuttle only students or employees to various points within the college or university campus or if a college or university owned or leased vehicle is used for the occasional transportation of college or university employees or students either on or off campus provided that the vehicle is operated by a college or university employee possessing a valid Rhode Island chauffeur’s license or a commercial drivers license with a passenger endorsement. Provided, however, that the college or university shall operate the shuttle service and there shall be no specific charge for the transportation of students or employees. The division of motor vehicles shall not issue a chauffeur’s license for either purpose unless the applicant has had at least one year of driving experience prior to the application, and has filed with the division of motor vehicles one or more certificates signed by a total of at least three (3) responsible people to whom he or she is well known certifying to the applicant’s good character and habits and the administrator of the division of motor vehicles is fully satisfied as to the applicant’s competency and fitness to be so employed.

In addition to the requirements provided in subsection (a) of this section, any person attempting to obtain a chauffeur’s license to drive a school bus transporting school children shall, prior to being certified:

Successfully complete a ten (10) hour school bus driver training course conducted by the department of revenue or the department of revenue’s designee and file a certificate of successful completion with the division of motor vehicles. The curriculum of that course and the accreditation of courses offered shall be pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the division of motor vehicles;

Pass a written examination prepared and given by the department of revenue or the department of revenue’s designee.

Pass a driving test in a school bus of a like type which that person will be employed to drive. The test will be prepared and given by the department of revenue.

Prior to issuing a certificate to any person who intends to drive a school bus, the division of motor vehicles shall conduct a search of that person’s motor vehicle record. Any violation of any safety regulation or conviction of any motor vehicle law in this or any other state shall be grounds for refusing to issue a certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 5; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-5

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 62; P.L. 2002, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 9; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 9.

31-10-5.1.
School bus driver annual training.

The department of revenue shall promulgate any rules and regulations that it deems necessary to ensure that a ten-hour (10) training course is provided for all new school bus drivers and a three-hour (3) retraining course is provided to all renewal applicants on at least a yearly basis.

The training shall include, but not be limited to, defensive driving, the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration’s School Bus Driver In-Service Series, and instruction in all state laws, rules, and regulations relating to school buses and school bus safety.

Prior to any renewal of any certificate of a school bus driver, the division of motor vehicles shall require proof of the renewal applicant’s having successfully completed the annual retraining as provided in this section. Every ten (10) years that proof shall include the passing of a written examination prepared by the department of revenue, or the department of revenue’s designee, and conducted by employees of the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 413, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 9; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 9; P.L. 2016, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 425, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.

31-10-6.
Graduated licensing for person under the age of eighteen (18).

Purpose. To ensure that license holders have sufficient training and experience and to promote safe, responsible driving, persons under the age of eighteen (18) shall be granted driving privileges on a limited basis as follows:

Level 1 — Limited instruction permit.

Level 2 — Limited provisional license.

Level 3 — Full operator’s license.

Requirements and privileges. A permit or license issued pursuant to this section must have a color background or border that indicates the level of driving privileges granted by the permit or license.

Limited instruction permit. Any person who is at least sixteen (16) years of age but less than eighteen (18) years of age may apply to the division of motor vehicles for a limited instruction permit. The division of motor vehicles may, after the applicant has successfully completed a course of driver training prescribed in §

31-10-19

and passed a standardized written examination approved by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles or otherwise complied with the requirements of §

31-10-21

, issue to the applicant a limited instruction permit that shall entitle the applicant to drive a motor vehicle only under the following conditions:

The permit holder must be in possession of the permit;

A supervising driver must be seated beside the permit holder in the front seat of the vehicle when it is in motion;

No person other than the supervising driver can be in the front seat;

Every person occupying the vehicle being driven by the permit holder must have a safety belt properly fastened about his or her body, or be restrained by a child passenger restraint system as provided in §

31-22-22

when the vehicle is in motion;

The permittee shall wear a safety belt at all times unless the permittee provides the division of motor vehicles with a statement from a physician indicating that for medical reasons the permittee cannot wear a safety belt. A limited instruction permit shall be valid for a period of one year, and may be extended for a reasonable period of time if the holder of the permit provides the division of motor vehicles with evidence of a hardship. Any person who is at least sixteen (16) years of age and is enrolled in a commercial drivers’ school or in a regularly recognized secondary school or college driver training program that is approved by the division of motor vehicles shall not be required to have a limited instruction permit while operating a dual-control training vehicle regularly used by that school in its driver training program and while a regular instructor in that school or program is occupying the seat beside that person.

Limited provisional license. A person may obtain a limited provisional license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

Has held a limited instruction permit issued by the division of motor vehicles for at least six (6) months;

Has not been convicted of a motor vehicle moving violation or seat belt infraction during the preceding six (6) months;

Passes a road test administered by the division of motor vehicles and shall also meet the requirements of subsection (b)(2)(iii) of this section.

A limited provisional license authorizes the license holder to drive a motor vehicle only under the following conditions:

The license holder must be in possession of the license.

The license holder may drive without supervision in any of the following circumstances:

From 5:00 a.m. to 1:00 a.m.;

When driving to or from work;

When driving to or from an activity of a volunteer fire department, volunteer rescue squad, or volunteer emergency medical service, if the driver is a member of one of these organizations;

From 4:00 a.m. to 5:00 a.m. when driving between the license holder’s home and a school-sponsored athletic activity for which no transportation is provided by the school.

The license holder may drive with supervision at any time. When the license holder is driving with supervision, the supervising driver must be seated beside the license holder in the front seat of the vehicle when it is in motion.

Every person occupying the vehicle being driven by the license holder must have a safety belt properly fastened about his or her body, or be restrained by a child safety passenger restraint system as provided in §

31-22-22

when the vehicle is in motion.

In addition to meeting the requirements of subsection (b)(2)(i) of this section, a person under the age of eighteen (18) years seeking to obtain a provisional license shall present with his or her application a statement signed by the person’s parent or guardian stating that the applicant has obtained a minimum of fifty (50) hours of experience with ten (10) of those at night as a driver while driving with a supervising driver. These fifty (50) hours may include driving lessons with a commercial driving school or any other supervised driving.

During the first twelve (12) months of a limited provisional license no more than one passenger younger than twenty-one (21) years of age is allowed in the vehicle. Immediate family/household members are excepted from this subsection.

Full operator’s license.

A person who is at least seventeen (17) years old but less than eighteen (18) years old may apply for and obtain a full operator’s license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

Has held a limited provisional license issued by the division of motor vehicles for at least twelve (12) months; and

Has not been convicted of a motor vehicle moving violation or seat belt infraction during the preceding six (6) months.

A person who meets the requirements of this section may obtain a full operator’s license by mail. The restrictions on Level 1 and Level 2 drivers concerning time of driving, supervision and passenger limitations do not apply to a full operator’s license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 6; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 13; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 8; P.L. 1954, ch. 3276, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-6

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 373, § 1.

31-10-6.1.
Supervising driver.

A supervising driver must be the parent, guardian, licensed foster parent or adult or a certified driver education instructor. A supervising driver must be a licensed driver who has been licensed to drive for five (5) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 2.

31-10-6.2.
Out-of-state exceptions.

A nonresident who is at least seventeen (17) years old but less than eighteen (18) years old, who has an unrestricted drivers license issued by that state, and who becomes a resident of this state may apply for and obtain within thirty (30) days of establishing residency one of the following:

Temporary permit. If the person has not completed a drivers education course that meets the requirements of the department of education but is currently enrolled in a drivers education course that meets these requirements. A temporary permit is valid for the period specified in the permit and authorizes the holder of the permit to drive a specified type or class of motor vehicle when in possession of the permit, subject to any restrictions imposed by the division of motor vehicles concerning time of driving, supervision, and passenger limitations. The period must end within ten (10) days after the expected completion date of the drivers education course in which the applicant is enrolled.

Full operator’s license. If the person has completed a drivers education course that meets the requirements of the department of elementary and secondary education; has held the license issued by the other state for at least twelve (12) months; and has not been convicted during the preceding six (6) months of a motor vehicle moving violation, a seat belt infraction, or an offense committed in another jurisdiction that would be a motor vehicle moving violation or seat belt infraction if committed in this state.

Limited provisional license. If the person has completed a drivers education course that meets the requirements of the department of elementary and secondary education but either did not hold the license issued by the other state for at least twelve (12) months; or was convicted during the preceding six (6) months of a motor vehicle moving violation, a seat belt infraction or an offense committed in another jurisdiction that would be a motor vehicle moving violation or seat belt infraction if committed in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 28.

31-10-6.3.
Duration and fee.

A limited instruction permit expires on the eighteenth (18th) birthday of the permit holder. A limited provisional license expires on the eighteenth (18th) birthday of the permit holder. A full operator’s license shall be issued and expires on the date pursuant to §

31-10-30

. The fee for a limited instruction permit or a limited provisional license is ten dollars ($10.00). The fee for a full operator’s license is the amount prescribed in §

31-10-31

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 2.

31-10-6.4.
Violations.

It is unlawful for the holder of a limited learner’s permit, a temporary permit or a limited provisional license to drive a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions that apply to that permit or license. Failure to comply with a restriction concerning time of driving or the presence of a supervising driver in the vehicle constitutes operating a motor vehicle without a license. Failure to comply with any other restriction, including seating and passenger limitations, is an infraction punishable by a monetary fine of eighty-five dollars ($85.00) for the first offense, ninety-five dollars ($95.00) for the second offense, and one hundred dollars ($100.00) for a third or any subsequent offenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 15.

31-10-6.5.
Insurance status.

The holder of a limited instruction permit is not considered a licensed driver for purposes of determining the inexperience operator premium surcharge pursuant to automobile insurance policies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 2.

31-10-7.
Temporary driver’s permit — Persons over the age of eighteen (18).

The division of motor vehicles may in its discretion issue a temporary driver’s permit to an applicant for a full operator’s license who has attained the age of eighteen (18). A temporary driver’s permit shall permit the applicant to operate a motor vehicle while the division of motor vehicles is completing its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the applicant’s right to receive a full operator’s license. The temporary driver’s permit must be in the applicant’s immediate possession while operating a motor vehicle, and it shall be invalid when the applicant’s license has been issued or for good cause has been refused.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 6; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 13; P.L. 1954, ch. 3276, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-7

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 1.

31-10-8.
Special armed forces operator’s license.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized to issue a special form of motor vehicle operator’s license, at no fee, to any person serving in the armed forces of the United States who at the time of his or her entrance into the armed forces was a legal resident of Rhode Island and the holder of a valid license. The special license shall be valid during the term of the person’s period of service and for thirty (30) days thereafter unless sooner cancelled, suspended, or revoked for cause, and the person shall, while operating a motor vehicle upon the public highways, carry the special license upon his or her person and shall also carry upon his or her person conclusive evidence of the fact that he or she is a member of the armed forces of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3584, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-8

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-10-9.
Operator’s license issued after expiration of armed forces license.

Whenever an armed forces special license shall become invalid by reason of expiration, the person to whom it was issued shall, within a period of three (3) years from the date of the expiration, be entitled to receive a regular motor vehicle operator’s license without submitting to an examination upon presentation of a proper application accompanied by the proper fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3584, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-9

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-10-10.
Rules as to armed forces license.

The special license provided for in §§

31-10-8

and

31-10-9

, shall be issued under any rules and in any form that the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may prescribe. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3584, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-10

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 106.

31-10-11.
Application forms — Destruction of refused applications.

Every application for an instruction permit or for an operator’s or chauffeur’s license shall be made upon a form furnished by the division of motor vehicles. Applications of unsuccessful applicants may be destroyed after a period of thirty (30) days from the date of the failure to pass the required examination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 7; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-11

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-10-12.
Contents of application.

Every application for an instruction permit or for a license shall:

State the full name, date of birth, sex, and residence address of the applicant;

Briefly describe the applicant;

State whether the applicant has previously been licensed as an operator or chauffeur, and, if so, when and by what state or country, and whether any such license has ever been suspended or revoked;

State whether an application has ever been refused, and, if so, the date of and reason for the suspension, revocation, or refusal; and

Provide any further information bearing on the applicant’s character or ability to drive that may be required by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

Every application shall state whether the applicant desires to donate tissue or organs pursuant to the provisions of chapter 18.6 of title 23.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-12

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 180, § 1.

31-10-13.
Record from other jurisdiction.

Whenever an application is received from a person previously licensed in another jurisdiction, the division of motor vehicles may request a copy of the operator’s record from that other jurisdiction. When received, the operator’s record shall become a part of the operator’s record in this state with the same force and effect as though entered on the operator’s record in this state in the original instance.

Whenever the division of motor vehicles receives a request for an operator’s record from another licensing jurisdiction the record shall be forwarded without charge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 371, § 1.

31-10-14.
Applications of minors.

The application of any person under the age of eighteen (18) years for a limited instruction permit, a limited provisional license, or a full operator’s license shall be signed and verified, before a person authorized to administer oaths, by one or more of the following individuals: the father, mother, guardian, adult husband or wife, or licensed foster parent, who is a resident of this state and qualified to be a supervising driver pursuant to §

31-10-6.1

. In the event there is no parent, guardian, or licensed foster parent, who meets these requirements, then by another responsible adult who is willing to assume the obligation imposed under §§

31-10-1

—

31-10-33

upon a person signing the application of a minor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-13

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-14

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 1.

31-10-15.
Liability of person signing minor’s application.

Any negligence or willful misconduct of a minor under the age of eighteen (18) years when driving a motor vehicle upon a highway shall be imputed to the person who has signed the application of that minor for a permit or license, which person shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for any damages caused by the minor’s negligence or willful misconduct except as otherwise provided in §

31-10-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-14

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-15

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-10-16.
Liability when minor proves financial responsibility.

In the event a minor deposits or there is deposited upon the minor’s behalf proof of financial responsibility in respect to the operation of a motor vehicle owned by the minor, or if not the owner of a motor vehicle, then with respect to the operation of any motor vehicle, in form and in amounts as required under the motor vehicle financial responsibility laws of this state, then the division of motor vehicles may accept the application of the minor when signed by a parent or guardian of the minor or other responsible adult, and while that proof is maintained the parent or guardian or responsible adult shall not be subject to the liability imposed under §

31-10-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-15

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-16

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-10-17.
Release from liability.

Any person who has signed the application of a minor for a license may later file with the division of motor vehicles a verified written request that the license granted to the minor be cancelled. On receipt of the request the division of motor vehicles shall cancel the license of the minor and the person who signed the application of the minor shall be relieved from the liability imposed under this chapter by reason of having signed the application on account of any subsequent negligence or willful misconduct of the minor in operating a motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-16

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-17

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-10-18.
Cancellation of license upon death of person signing minor’s application.

The division of motor vehicles upon receipt of satisfactory evidence of the death of the person who signed the application of a minor for a license shall cancel the license and shall not issue a new license until such time as a new application, duly signed and verified, is made as required by this chapter. This provision shall not apply in the event the minor has attained the age of eighteen (18) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 15, § 10; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-17

; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-18

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-10-19.
Driver education — Traffic safety education. [Contingent amendment; see other version.]

The community college of Rhode Island shall provide thirty-three (33) hours of classroom instruction for applicants or prospective applicants, not more than twenty-one (21) years of age for a limited instruction permit or license. The instruction shall include eight (8) hours, specifically for instruction on the effects of alcohol and drugs on a driver, and the instruction shall be given by a person eligible for a teacher’s certificate issued under the authority of the state board of regents and which course of instruction shall be approved by the board of governors for higher education. In case of emergency, the president of the community college of Rhode Island may declare, when no certified instructor is available to teach, an individual eligible to teach at the community college of Rhode Island who has taken the required course of instruction in driver education, may provide driver education instruction. All driver education programs shall include information concerning the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6.1 of title 23, and information on donor cards pursuant to the applicable provisions of chapter 18.6.1 of title 23. The board of governors for higher education shall ensure that each person properly certified and approved to instruct driver education courses shall be given an equal opportunity for employment as an instructor within the driver education program. No person teaching driver education under this section shall own, be employed by, or be associated with a commercial driving school.

Driver education instruction shall be available to any eligible resident applicant not less than fifteen (15) years and ten (10) months of age.

That the state shall also provide a separate program of instruction, as previously set forth in this section, for special needs students whose individual education plan (IEP) indicates a need for a separate program of instruction.

The community college of Rhode Island shall provide a driver training program for physically handicapped drivers. The program shall instruct the physically handicapped driver in the operation of adapted vehicles for the handicapped. The adapted vehicles are to be provided by the handicapped individual. A physically handicapped person must be certified by a licensed physician that he or she is physically handicapped and possesses sufficient potential to become a competent motor vehicle operator. The community college of Rhode Island shall establish a tuition fee sufficient to cover the cost of the program.

A tuition or enrollment fee shall be required to be paid by an eligible applicant in accordance with rules and regulations of the board of governors for higher education; provided, that personal checks shall be an acceptable method of payment of the tuition or enrollment fee. The tuition or enrollment fee shall be deposited in a restricted receipt account established to pay any and all costs associated with the driver education program at the community college of Rhode Island and administered by the community college of Rhode Island.

The board of governors for higher education is authorized to establish administrative regulations to further implement this section.

The community college of Rhode Island shall establish tuition fees sufficient to cover the cost of the program and the administration of the driver education program. All positions established to implement the driver education program and funded in full by driver education program fees shall be exempt from the full-time equivalency cap established in Article 1 of the Appropriations Act, provided, however, that the board of governors shall report by June 1, 2004, the actual number of filled positions funded exclusively by driver education fees to the chairperson of the house finance committee, the chairperson of the senate finance committee, and the state budget officer.

The board of governors for higher education shall provide for an optional and voluntary course of instruction for the applicant’s parent, guardian, or designee where applicable, on the content of the driver education curriculum and the requirements for the graduated licensing for persons under the age of eighteen (18) as contained in §

31-10-6

. The community college of Rhode Island shall be responsible to develop the course of instruction and content for the parent instruction, or may approve a similar course of instruction, such as AAA’s course, as equivalent to it, and shall promulgate regulations and establish the appropriate method of providing the instruction.

Dangers of distracted driving, including, but not limited to, use of cell phones would be included in this section curriculum and included in all testing as part of the state’s driver’s license examination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 189, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-32

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-10-19

; P.L. 1970, ch. 111, § 8; P.L. 1971, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. XI, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 103; P.L. 1998, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 22.